District of Columbia statutes.
34-602

Commission may rescind, alter, or amend orders fixing rates.

The Commission may, at any time, upon notice to the public utility and after opportunity to be heard as provided in § 34-910, rescind, alter, or amend any order fixing any rate or rates, tolls, charges, or schedules, or any other order made by the Commission, and certified copies of the same shall be served and take effect as herein provided for original orders.

History

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 988, ch. 150, § 8, par. 62

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-902.
1973 Ed., § 43-702.